Colorado, session 2026A, HB1155.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In
Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206),
amend Part VI, as Part VI is amended by section 5 of chapter 150, (SB
25-228), and section 17 of chapter 151, (SB 25-270), Session Laws of
Colorado, as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART VI
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(A) General Administration
Personal Services 75,859,772
76,144,403
(791.2 FTE)
(795.8 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 12,823,330
13,063,358
Short-term Disability 51,482
51,631
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 377,655
378,612
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 7,918,630
7,939,888
Salary Survey 2,299,634
Step Pay 151,359
PERA Direct Distribution 1,638,429
Workers' Compensation 230,107
Operating Expenses 3,334,907
3,400,301
Legal Services 2,824,915
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Administrative Law Judge
Services 2,172,417
2,636,344
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 280,008
Leased Space 3,700,205
3,712,918
Payments to OIT 17,787,189
15,566,219
CORE Operations 35,879
General Professional
Services and Special
Projects 45,810,958
47,899,410
177,296,876 68,415,360 14,014,622a 3,852,606b 91,014,288(I)
178,253,415 69,183,269 14,104,503a 91,113,037(I)
a Of this amount, $12,528,882 $12,618,763 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.,$399,810 shall
be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Nursing Facility Provider Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.5)(a), C.R.S., $361,397 shall be from the Children's
Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., $278,999 shall be from the Adult Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $204,488 shall be from
the Primary Care Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., $131,531 shall be from the Nursing Home Penalty Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., $59,140
shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Intermediate Care Facility Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.7)(a), C.R.S., and $50,375 shall be from the
Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,374,082 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center line item appropriation,
$881,600 shall be from statewide indirect cost recoveries, $839,181 shall be transferred from the Colorado Benefits Management System, Health Care and Economic Security Staff
Development Center line item appropriation in this department, $577,832 shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State
Institutions for Speciality Education Programs line item, $95,773 shall be from the Department of Personnel and Administration, $57,678 shall be from the Department of Early Childhood,
and $26,460 shall be from the Department of Public Health and Environment from the Women, Infants, and Children Supplemental Food Grant line item.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Information Technology Contracts and Projects
Medicaid Management
Information System
Maintenance and Projects 104,857,279 14,958,219 10,671,589a 12,204b 79,215,267(I)
108,417,161 14,972,432 10,679,408a 82,753,117(I)
Colorado Benefits
Management Systems,
Operating and Contract
Expenses18, 19 88,214,394 12,900,116(M) 8,079,990c 15,526,968d 51,707,320
106,142,146 12,909,380(M) 8,407,287c 32,110,715d 52,714,764
Colorado Benefits
Management Systems,
Health Care and Economic
Security Staff Development
Center18, 19 2,173,592 693,353(M) 379,255e 73b 1,100,911
Office of eHealth
Innovations Operations 8,812,035 2,450,382 671,985f 5,689,668(I)
8,716,035 2,411,251 664,397f 5,640,387(I)
(3.0 FTE)
All-Payer Claims Database 9,619,029 3,541,068 685,936f 5,392,025(I)
213,676,329
235,067,963
a Of this amount, $8,832,713 $8,840,532 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $1,240,975 shall
be from the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., and $597,901 shall be from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing Cash Fund
created in Section 25.5-1-109, C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
c Of this amount, $7,549,605 $7,796,902 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $530,385 shall
be from the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., AND $80,000 SHALL BE FROM AN INTERGOVERNMENTAL TRANSFER FROM THE REGIONAL
TRANSPORTATION DISTRICT.
d Of this amount, $14,847,374 $31,377,858 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services, $560,254 shall be transferred from the Department of Early Childhood, $117,688
$126,334 shall be transferred from the Department of Public Health and Environment, $44,617 SHALL BE FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND EMPLOYMENT, and $1,652 shall be
transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department.
e Of this amount, $358,144 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S. and $21,111 shall be from the
Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S.
f These amounts shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(C) Eligibility Determinations and Client Services
Contracts for Special
Eligibility Determinations 5,588,957 1,234,071(M) 913,169a 3,441,717
6,863,957 2,036,615(M) 748,125a 4,079,217
County Administration 136,311,489 21,555,147(M) 30,777,803b 83,978,539
134,990,813 21,338,324(M) 30,475,191b 83,177,298
Medical Assistance Sites 1,531,968 402,984a 1,128,984(I)
Administrative Case
Management 869,744 434,872(M) 434,872
Customer Outreach 3,461,519 1,141,090(M) 589,670a 1,730,759
Centralized Eligibility
Vendor Contract Project 7,959,455 2,753,409a 5,206,046(I)
Connect for Health
Colorado Eligibility
Determinations 11,174,846 4,995,156c 6,179,690(I)
Eligibility Overflow
Processing Center 1,904,677 313,938(M) 162,231a 1,428,508
Returned Mail Processing 3,298,808 979,135(M) 251,592d 111,942e 1,956,139
Income Verification
Programs 11,341,713 1,869,398(M) 966,030a 8,506,285
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Non-Emergent Medical
Transportation Broker 3,950,066 1,185,020(M) 790,013a 1,975,033
187,393,242
187,347,566
a These amounts shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $22,358,429(I) $22,134,496(I) shall be from local funds and $8,419,374 $8,340,695 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created
in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount represents public funds certified as expenditures incurred by Connect for Health Colorado that are eligible for federal financial participation under the Medicaid program.
d Of this amount, $212,856 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $38,736 shall be from the
Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S.
e Of this amount, $111,929 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Colorado Benefits Management System, Ongoing Expenses line item and $13 shall
be transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department.
(D) Utilization and Quality Review Contracts
Professional Services
Contracts 38,038,830 10,008,906(M) 2,223,661a 25,806,263
37,774,263 9,870,372(M) 25,680,230
a Of this amount, $2,033,593 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $88,750 shall be from the Adult
Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $64,443 shall be from the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., and $36,875 shall be
from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Nursing Facility Provider Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.
(E) Provider Audits and Services
Professional Audit Contracts 4,708,809 1,845,401(M) 579,974a 2,283,434
4,616,813 533,976a 2,237,436
a Of this amount, $418,568 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $102,988 shall be from the
Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., $45,998 shall be from the Primary Care Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., and $12,420
shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Nursing Facility Provider Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.5)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(F) Recoveries and Recoupment Contract Costs
Estate Recovery 1,165,841 582,920a 582,921(I)
Third-Party Liability Cost
Avoidance Contract 8,838,738 2,916,784(M) 1,502,585b 4,419,369
10,004,579
a This amount shall be from estate recoveries.
b This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(G) Indirect Cost Recoveries
Indirect Cost Assessment 881,600 277,887a 79,516b 524,197(I)
a Of this amount, $243,707 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $12,116 shall be from the Medical
Nursing Facility Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-203 (2)(a), C.R.S., $8,504 shall be from the Adult Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $6,252 shall be from
the Primary Care Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., $3,974 shall be from the Nursing Home Penalty Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-6-205 (3)(a), C.R.S., $1,778
shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Intermediate Care Facility Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.7)(a), C.R.S., and $1,556 shall be from the
Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $37,472 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center line item appropriation,
$26,899 shall be from transferred from the Colorado Benefits Management System, Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center line item appropriation in this
department, and $15,145 shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Speciality Education Programs line
item.
632,000,265
653,946,199
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(2) MEDICAL SERVICES PREMIUMS
Medical and Long-Term
Care Services for Medicaid
Eligible Individuals 13,365,398,428 2,591,984,332(M) 1,292,968,309a 1,480,091,193b 124,197,922c 7,876,156,672
14,017,977,042 2,682,195,022(M) 1,648,116,456b 8,270,499,333
a This amount shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $1,121,530,725 $1,279,811,834 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $76,010,738
$102,007,068 recoveries and recoupments, $73,586,261 $58,809,782 shall be from the Adult Dental Fund created in Section 25.5-5-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., $62,525,000 $61,501,951 shall
be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Nursing Facility Provider Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.5)(a), C.R.S., $60,581,773 represents public funds
certified as expenditures incurred by public emergency medical transportation providers, $46,929,200 shall be from the Health Care Expansion Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(a)(I),
C.R.S., $28,169,342 $28,029,692 represents public funds certified as expenditures incurred by public hospitals and agencies that are eligible for federal financial participation under the
Medicaid program, $6,660,761 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Medicaid Buy-in Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.1)(a), C.R.S., $1,503,600
$1,491,000 shall be from the Tobacco Tax Cash Fund created in section 24-22-117 (1)(a), C.R.S., and meets the requirement to appropriate a portion of the revenues collected from the
imposition of additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes to the Old Age Pension program for health related purposes pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution,
$857,151 shall be from the Tobacco Education Programs Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(c)(I), C.R.S., $836,182 $535,784 shall be from the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention
and Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S., $700,000 shall be from an intergovernmental transfer from Denver Health, and $200,460 shall be from the Healthcare
Affordability and Sustainability Intermediate Care Facility Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.7)(a), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $112,280,907 shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Speciality Education Programs
line item, $9,253,841 shall be transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department, $1,505,000
shall be from the Department of Early Childhood from the Home Visiting line item, and $1,158,174 shall be transferred from Public School Health Services line item in the Other Medical
Services division of this department.
(3) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH COMMUNITY PROGRAMS
Behavioral Health
Capitation Payments 1,451,675,162 349,844,933(M) 121,980,456a 979,849,773
1,576,377,067 366,639,665(M) 127,670,433a 1,082,066,969
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Behavioral Health
Fee-for-service Payments 11,346,614 2,726,359(M) 673,095a 7,947,160
10,336,937 2,483,755(M) 613,201a 7,239,981
1,463,021,776
1,586,714,004
a Of these amounts, $122,607,105 $127,743,581 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $500,000
SHALL BE FROM THE MARIJUANA TAX CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $46,446 $40,053 shall be from the Breast and Cervical Cancer Prevention and
Treatment Fund created in Section 25.5-5-308 (8)(a)(I), C.R.S.
(4) OFFICE OF COMMUNITY LIVING
(A) Division of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
(1) Administrative Costs
Personal Services 3,469,613 1,858,480(M) 1,611,133
(39.5 FTE)
Operating Expenses 281,510 164,636(M) 116,874
Community and Contract
Management System 137,480 89,362(M) 48,118
Support Level
Administration 58,350 28,920(M) 255a 29,175
3,946,953
a This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(2) Medicaid Programs20
Adult Comprehensive
Services 943,198,318
969,544,678
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Adult Supported Living
Services 125,347,265
107,263,637
Children's Extensive
Support Services 147,638,446
148,787,890
Children's Habilitation
Residential Program 31,570,797
38,368,867
Case Management for
People with Disabilities 149,895,987
166,577,105
1,397,650,813 675,945,687(M) 20,943,946a 700,761,180
1,430,542,177 695,276,500(M) 20,606,171a 714,659,506
a Of this amount, $20,943,945 $20,606,170 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $1 shall be
from the Health Care Expansion Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S.
(3) State-only Programs21
Family Support Services 11,436,277
11,315,225
State Supported Living
Services 5,375,632
5,318,732
State Supported Living
Services Case Management 5,238,505
5,183,056
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Preventive Dental Hygiene22 72,271
71,506
22,122,685 22,122,685
21,888,519 21,888,519
1,423,720,451
1,456,377,649
(5) INDIGENT CARE PROGRAM
Safety Net Provider
Payments 226,610,308 113,305,154a 113,305,154(I)
Pediatric Specialty Hospital 13,455,012 6,727,506(M) 6,727,506
4,580,424(M) 8,874,588
Appropriation from
Tobacco Tax Cash Fund to
the General Fund 293,077 293,077b
Primary Care Fund Program 34,771,339 17,516,461c 17,254,878(I)
Children's Basic Health Plan
Administration 3,864,405 1,352,542(H)d 2,511,863
Children's Basic Health Plan
Medical and Dental Costs 317,847,540 59,359,766 293,077e 51,658,796(H)f 206,535,901
295,050,786 52,520,811 50,518,887(H)f 191,718,011
596,841,681
574,044,927
a This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Tobacco Tax Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (l)(a), C.R.S. This appropriation partially meets the requirement to appropriate a portion of the
revenues collected from imposition of additional state cigarette and tobacco taxes to the General Fund pursuant to Section 21 of Article X of the State Constitution.
c This amount shall be from the Primary Care Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
d Of this amount, $1,347,131 shall be from the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., and $5,411 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and
Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from General Fund Exempt Account pursuant to Section 24-22-117 (1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S., and is not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund
appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
f Of this amount, $40,584,673 $39,466,086 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., $10,569,497
$10,569,625 shall be from the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S., $404,625 $383,175 shall be from the Colorado Immunization Fund created
in Section 25-4-2301, C.R.S., $100,000 shall be from recoveries and recoupments, and $1 shall be from the Health Care Expansion Fund created in Section 24-22-117 (2)(a)(I), C.R.S.
(6) OTHER MEDICAL SERVICES
Old Age Pension State
Medical Program 10,000,000 10,000,000a
Senior Dental Program 3,990,358 3,962,510 27,848b
3,490,358 3,462,510
Commission on Family
Medicine Residency
Training Programs 9,490,170 4,520,085(M) 225,000c 4,745,085
3,034,046(M) 196,737c 6,259,387
Medicare Modernization
Act State Contribution
Payment 272,802,633 272,802,633
268,225,649 268,225,649
Public School Health
Services Contract
Administration 2,000,000 1,000,000(M) 1,000,000
Public School Health
Services 198,563,973 99,281,987d 99,281,986(I)
187,451,256 93,725,628d 93,725,628(I)
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Screening, Brief
Intervention, and Referral to
Treatment Training Grant
Program23 1,500,000 1,500,000e
1,000,000 1,000,000e
Reproductive Health Care
for Individuals Not Eligible
for Medicaid 2,614,490 2,614,490
Health Benefits for Children
Lacking Access Due to
Immigration Status 32,075,606 32,075,606
53,360,259 53,360,259
Telehealth Remote
Monitoring Grant Program 500,000 500,000
533,537,230
538,132,182
a This amount shall be from the Old Age Pension Health and Medical Care Fund created in Section 25.5-2-101 (2), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-1-109, C.R.S.
c This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Higher Education from the Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Speciality Education Programs line item.
d This amount represents funds certified as public expenditures incurred by school districts or boards of cooperative educational services that are eligible for federal financial participation
under Medicaid.
e This amount shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
(7) TRANSFERS TO OTHER STATE DEPARTMENT MEDICAID-FUNDED PROGRAMS
(A) Early Childhood
Transfer to Department of
Early Childhood for Early
Intervention 5,940,111 2,970,056(M) 2,970,055
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(B) Education
Public School Health
Services 208,269 104,135(M) 104,134
(C) Human Services
(1) Executive Director's
Office24 17,942,157 8,971,079(M) 8,971,078
18,204,527 9,102,264(M) 9,102,263
(2) Office of Children, Youth and Families
Child Welfare
Administration 352,543 145,627(M) 206,916
Child Welfare Services 14,383,230 7,191,615(M) 7,191,615
Division of Youth Services 758,785 379,394(M) 379,391
15,494,558
(3) Office of Economic Security
Administration 240,000 72,180(M) 47,820a 120,000
Systematic Alien
Verification for Eligibility 116,804 58,403(M) 58,401
356,804
a This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
(4) Behavioral Health Administration
Community Behavioral
Health Administration 926,843 463,421(M) 463,422
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Children and Youth Mental
Health Treatment Act 137,680 68,840(M) 68,840
1,064,523
(5) Office of Civil and
Forensic Mental Health
Mental Health Institutes 8,762,879 4,381,439(M) 4,381,440
11,014,933 5,507,466(M) 5,507,467
Mental Health Transitional
Living Homes 5,165,032 2,582,516(M) 2,582,516
13,927,911
16,179,965
(6) Office of Adults, Aging and Disability Services
Administration 503,562 251,781(M) 251,781
Regional Centers for People
with Developmental
Disabilities 59,760,345 27,991,270(M) 1,888,903a 29,880,172
Community Services for the
Elderly 1,001,800 500,900(M) 500,900
61,265,707
a This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Intermediate Care Facility Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5.7)(a), C.R.S.
(7) Other
Department of Human
Services Indirect Cost
Assessment 24,117,640 12,058,820(M) 12,058,820
24,523,468 12,261,734(M) 12,261,734
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(D) Local Affairs
Home Modifications Benefit
Administration 313,881 156,941(M) 156,940
Host Home Regulation 325,578 162,789(M) 162,789
639,459
(E) Public Health and Environment
Facility Survey and
Certification 9,279,704 3,861,449(M) 5,418,255
Prenatal Statistical
Information 6,196 3,098(M) 3,098
9,285,900
(F) Regulatory Agencies
Nurse Aide Certification 324,041 147,369(M) 14,652a 162,020
Sunset Reviews 3,750 1,875(M) 1,875
327,791
a This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Regulatory Agencies from the Payments to Department of Health Care Policy and Financing line item appropriation.
(G) Revenue
Hospital Tax Exemptions 100,000 50,000(H)a 50,000
a This amount shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
150,670,830
153,591,082
PAGE 16-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART VI
(HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND
FINANCING)25 $18,165,190,661 $4,247,295,247 $1,293,261,386a $2,002,883,994b $144,020,883 $10,477,729,151c
$18,980,783,085 $4,381,549,873 $2,168,909,052b $160,576,367 $10,976,486,407c
a Of this amount, $1,292,968,309 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., and $293,077 shall be General Fund Exempt pursuant to
Section 24-22-117 (1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S. Said $293,077 is not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $22,358,429 $22,134,496 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $424,775,104 $422,806,064 contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
18 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Executive Director's Office, Information Technology Contracts and Projects, Colorado Benefits Management
Systems, Operating and Contract Expenses; Colorado Benefits Management Systems, Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center -- In
addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department may transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriations within the
line items designated with this footnote. The Department is also authorized to transfer up to 5.0 percent of the total appropriations within the line items
designated with this footnote to line item appropriations within the Department of Human Services, Office of Information Technology Services, Colorado
Benefits Management System subsection.
19 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Executive Director's Office, Information Technology Contracts and Projects, Colorado Benefits Management
Systems, Operating and Contract Expenses; Colorado Benefits Management Systems, Health Care and Economic Security Staff Development Center -- Of
this appropriation, $2,500,000 remains available for expenditure until the close of the 2025-26 state fiscal year.
20 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Office of Community Living, Division of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, Medicaid Programs
-- It is the General Assembly's intent that expenditures for these services be recorded only against the Long Bill group total for Medicaid Programs.
21 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Office of Community Living, Division of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, State-only Programs
-- It is the General Assembly's intent that expenditures for these services be recorded only against the Long Bill group total for State-only Programs.
22 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Office of Community Living, Division of Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities, State-only Programs,
Preventive Dental Hygiene -- It is the General Assembly's intent that this appropriation be used to provide special dental services for persons with intellectual
PAGE 17-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
and developmental disabilities.
23 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Other Medical Services, Screening, Brief Intervention, and Referral to Treatment Training Grant Program
-- It is the General Assembly's intent that this appropriation be used to sustain the grant program for screening, brief intervention, and referral to treatment
for individuals at risk of substance abuse that is authorized in Section 25.5-5-208, C.R.S., in accordance with the requirements set forth in that section.
24 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Transfers to Other State Department Medicaid-Funded Programs, Human Services, Executive Director's
Office -- The appropriation in this Health Care Policy and Financing line item corresponds to the Medicaid funding in the Department of Human Services,
Executive Director's Office, General Administration. As such, the appropriation contains amounts that correspond to centralized appropriation amounts in
the Department of Human Services. Consistent with section 24-75-105, C.R.S., the Department of Human Services may transfer the centralized appropriations
to other line item appropriations in the Department of Human Services. In order to aid budget reconciliation between the Department of Health Care Policy
and Financing and the Department of Human Services, the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing may make line item transfers out of this
appropriation to other Department of Human Services Medicaid-funded programs appropriations in this section (7) in amounts equal to the centralized
appropriation transfers made by the Department of Human Services for Medicaid-funded programs in the Department of Human Services.
25 Department of Health Care Policy and Financing, Totals; Department of Higher Education, College Opportunity Fund Program, Fee-for-service Contracts
with State Institutions, Fee-for-service Contracts with State Institutions for Specialty Education Programs; Governing Boards, Regents of the University of
Colorado -- The Department of Higher Education shall transfer $900,000 to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing for administrative costs and
family medicine residency placements associated with care provided by the faculty of the health sciences center campus at the University of Colorado that
are eligible for payment pursuant to Section 25.5-4-401, C.R.S. If the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid services continues to allow the Department
of Health Care Policy and Financing to make supplemental payments to the University of Colorado School of Medicine, the Department of Higher Education
shall transfer the amount approved, up to $112,280,907, to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing pursuant to Section 23-18-304(1)(c), C.R.S.
If permission is discontinued, or is granted for a lesser amount, the Department of Higher Education shall transfer any portion of the $112,280,907 that is not
transferred to the Department of Health Care Policy and Financing to the Regents of the University of Colorado.
PAGE 18-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of health care policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section
2 of chapter 519, (HB 24-1430), amend Part VI (1)(C) and the affected totals as Part VI (1)(C) and the affected totals are amended by section 1 of chapter 456, (SB 25-093), and section
9 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), Session Laws of Colorado 2025, as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART VI
DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH CARE POLICY AND FINANCING
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR'S OFFICE
(C) Eligibility Determinations and Client Services
Contracts for Special
Eligibility Determinations 12,039,555 1,134,071(M) 4,338,468a 6,567,016
County Administration 123,048,230 21,004,349(M) 26,624,750b 75,419,131
124,745,669 77,116,570
Medical Assistance Sites 1,531,968 402,984a 1,128,984(I)
Administrative Case
Management 869,744 434,872(M) 434,872
Customer Outreach 3,461,519 1,394,139(M) 336,621a 1,730,759
Centralized Eligibility
Vendor Contract Project 7,959,455 2,753,409a 5,206,046(I)
Connect for Health
Colorado Eligibility
Determinations 11,174,846 4,995,156c 6,179,690(I)
Eligibility Overflow
Processing Center 1,904,677 285,320(M) 190,849a 1,428,508
Returned Mail Processing 3,298,808 985,808(M) 244,919d 111,942e 1,956,139
Income Verification
Programs 11,341,713 1,741,440(M) 1,093,988a 8,506,285
PAGE 19-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Non-emergent Medical
Transportation Broker 3,950,066 1,185,020(M) 790,013a 1,975,033
180,580,581
182,278,020
a These amounts shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $19,254,185(I) shall be from local funds and $7,370,565 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4
(5)(a), C.R.S.
c This amount represents public funds certified as expenditures incurred by Connect for Health Colorado that are eligible for federal financial participation under the Medicaid
program.
d Of this amount, $206,183 shall be from the Healthcare Affordability and Sustainability Fee Cash Fund created in Section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., and $38,736 shall be from
the Children's Basic Health Plan Trust created in Section 25.5-8-105 (1), C.R.S.
e Of this amount, $111,929 shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services from the Colorado Benefits Management System, Ongoing Expenses line item and $13 shall
be transferred from the Old Age Pension State Medical Program line item appropriation in the Other Medical Services division of this department.
TOTALS PART VI
(HEALTH CARE
POLICY AND
FINANCING)30 $16,893,635,423 $3,927,780,977 $1,249,130,701a $1,947,905,981b $137,592,164 $9,631,225,600c
$16,895,332,862 $9,632,923,039c
a Of this amount, $1,247,280,333 shall be from the General Fund Exempt Account created in Section 24-77-103.6 (2), C.R.S., and $291,034 shall be General Fund Exempt pursuant
to Section 24-22-117 (1)(c)(I)(B.5), C.R.S. Said $291,034 is not subject to the statutory limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1, C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $19,254,185 contains an (I) notation.
c Of this amount, $442,530,087 contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 20-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

SECTION 3. Appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024.
(1) For the 2024-25 state fiscal year, $109,143,378 is appropriated to the
department of health care policy and financing and is for the payment of
overexpenditures of line item appropriations contained in Part VI of
section 2 of chapter 519 (HB 24-1430), Session Laws of Colorado 2024,
as follows:
(a) $15,267,906 reappropriated funds from the department of
human services for Colorado benefits management systems, operating and
contract expenses;
(b) $52,435 reappropriated funds from the department of early
childhood for Colorado benefits management systems, operating and
contract expenses;
(c) $30,415 reappropriated funds from the department of public
health and environment for Colorado benefits management systems,
operating and contract expenses;
(d) $46,153,277 from the general fund, for medical and long-term
care services for Medicaid eligible individuals;
(e) $5,371,383 from the general fund for behavioral health
capitation payments;
(f) $478,777 from the general fund for adult comprehensive
services;
(g) $3,225,375 from the home- and community-based services
improvement fund created in section 25.5-6-1805 (1), C.R.S., for adult
comprehensive services;
(h) $1,959,736 from the general fund for adult supported living
waiver services;
(i) $5,830,197 from the general fund for children's extensive
support services;
(j) $642,696 from the general fund for case management for
people with disabilities;
PAGE 21-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

(k) $20,246,694 from the healthcare affordability and sustainability
fee cash fund created in section 25.5-4-402.4 (5)(a), C.R.S., for safety net
provider payments;
(l) $409,393 from the primary care fund created in section
24-22-117 (2)(b)(I), C.R.S., for the primary care fund program;
(m) $536,414 from the general fund for Medicare modernization
act state contribution payment;
(n) $1,322,335 cash funds from certified public expenditures for
public school health services;
(o) $1,743,037 from the general fund for health benefits for
children lacking access due to immigration status;
(p) $3,400,285 from the general fund, for child welfare services;
and
(q) $2,473,023 from the general fund for mental health institutes.
(2) In accordance with section 24-75-109 (4)(a), C.R.S., all
restrictions on funds for the department of health care policy and
financing for the 2025-26 state fiscal year for the amounts and items of
appropriation listed in this section are released.
SECTION 4. Appropriation to the department of health care
policy and financing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In
Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 5 of chapter 274, (SB 25-290),
amend (1)(c) as follows:
Section 5. Appropriation. (1) For the 2025-26 state fiscal year,
$25,000,000 $45,000,000 is appropriated to the department of health care
policy and financing. This appropriation is from the provider stabilization
fund created in section 25.5-3-603 (1)(a), C.R.S. To implement this act,
the department may use this appropriation as follows:
(c) $24,845,595 $44,845,595 for provider stabilization payments
related to other medical services.
PAGE 22-HOUSE BILL 26-1155

SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 23-HOUSE BILL 26-1155